test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-eebir_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - eebir: # 2A v - k -v, b > b'b, ee > iä, i>á
    eebir+N+Sg+Nom: eebir
    eebir+N+Sg+Gen: iäb´bár
    eebir+N+Sg+Acc: iäb´bár
    eebir+N+Sg+Ill: iäb´bárân
    eebir+N+Sg+Loc: iäb´bárist
    eebir+N+Sg+Com: iäb´báráin
    eebir+N+Sg+Abe: iäb´bárttáá
    eebir+N+Ess: [iäb´bárin, ebirin]
    eebir+N+Par: [iäb´bárid, ebirid]
    eebir+N+Pl+Nom: iäb´báreh
    eebir+N+Pl+Gen: iäb´bárij
    eebir+N+Pl+Acc: iäb´bárijd
    eebir+N+Pl+Ill: iäb´báráid
    eebir+N+Pl+Loc: iäb´bárijn
    eebir+N+Pl+Com: iäb´bárijguin
    eebir+N+Pl+Abe: iäb´bárijttáá
